Utah statutes.
34A-2-422.   Compensation exempt from execution -- Transfer of payment
rights.
(1)  For purposes of this section:
(a)  "Payment rights under workers' compensation" means the right to receive
compensation under this chapter or Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act,
including the payment of a workers' compensation claim, award, benefit, or
settlement.
(b) (i)  Subject to Subsection (1)(b)(ii), "transfer" means:
(A)  a sale;
(B)  an assignment;
(C)  a pledge;
(D)  an hypothecation; or
(E)  other form of encumbrance or alienation for consideration.
(ii)  "Transfer" does not include the creation or perfection of a security
interest in a right to receive a payment under a blanket security agreement
entered into with an insured depository institution, in the absence of any
action to:
(A)  redirect the payments to:
(I)  the insured depository institution; or
(II)  an agent or successor in interest to the insured depository institution;
or
(B)  otherwise enforce a blanket security interest against the payment rights.
(2)  Compensation before payment:
(a)  is exempt from:
(i)  all claims of creditors; and
(ii)  attachment or execution; and
(b)  shall be paid only to employees or their dependents, except as provided
in Sections 26-19-5 and 34A-2-417.
(3) (a)  Subject to Subsection (3)(b), beginning April 30, 2007, a person may
not:
(i)  transfer payment rights under workers' compensation; or
(ii)  accept or take any action to provide for a transfer of payment rights
under workers' compensation.
(b)  A person may take an action prohibited under Subsection (3)(a) if the
commission approves the transfer of payment rights under workers'
compensation:
(i)  before the transfer of payment rights under workers' compensation takes
effect; and
(ii)  upon a determination by the commission that:
(A)  the person transferring the payment rights under workers' compensation
received before executing an agreement to transfer those payment rights:
(I)  adequate notice that the transaction involving the transfer of payment
rights under workers' compensation involves the transfer of those payment
rights; and
(II)  an explanation of the financial consequences of and alternatives to the
transfer of payment rights under workers' compensation in sufficient detail
that the person transferring the payment rights under workers' compensation
made an informed decision to transfer those payment rights; and
(B)  the transfer of payment rights under workers' compensation is in the best
interest of the person transferring the payment rights under workers'
compensation taking into account the welfare and support of that person's
dependents.
(c)  The approval by the commission of the transfer of a person's payment
rights under workers' compensation is a full and final resolution of the
person's payment rights under workers' compensation that are transferred:
(i)  if the commission approves the transfer of the payment rights under
workers' compensation in accordance with Subsection (3)(b); and
(ii)  once the person no longer has a right to appeal the decision in
accordance with this title.
